Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-805
Regional Radiation Health Center; created; purpose.

There is hereby created a Regional Radiation Health Center, to be developed within the University of Nebraska Medical Center Hospital and supervised by the University of Nebraska Medical Center, for the purpose of offering: (1) Specialized medical and related services for evaluation, treatment, and management of radiation casualties; (2) routine medical, radiation protection, consultation, and associated services to nuclear-oriented facilities and industry generally associated with radiation sources; and (3) educational programs for nuclear safety, with emphasis on preventive medical and radiologic protection in industry.

Regional Radiation Health Center facilities and services may also be utilized for the care and treatment of patients other than radiation casualties whenever such facilities are not being fully utilized for radiation casualties.

Laws 1972, LB 1405, § 1.